North Carolina, session 2025, HB291.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The following described North Carolina Department of Transportation
rights-of-way are added to the corporate limits of the Town of Franklinton:
Starting point: Creek under US Highway 1, US Highway 1, Ending point: US Highway 1
Intersection with Eric Medlin Road;
NC 56 Intersection with Fred Wilder Road, NC 56 to US 1 Interchange;
NC 56 & Lane Store Road Intersection, NC 56, NC 56 & Mays Crossroads Road Intersection;
Mays Crossroads Road & NC 56 Intersection, Mays Crossroads Road;
Lane Store Road & NC 56 Intersection, Lane Store Road, Lane Store Road & Cedar Creek Road
Intersection;
Cedar Creek Road and Lane Store Road Intersection, Cedar Creek Road, Cedar Creek Road at
crossing point of stream;
South Cheatham Street & Janice Avenue Intersection, South Cheatham Street, South Cheatham
Street & US Highway 1;
US 1A & US 1 (South Main Street & US 1 Intersection), US 1A (Main Street), US 1A & US 1
(North Main Street & US 1 Intersection);
South Chavis Street & East College Street (east intersection), South Chavis Street, South Chavis
Street & East College Street (west intersection);
South Chavis & Carver Street Intersection, Carver Street Eastern Terminus of right-of-way;
South Chavis Street & Dogwood Lane Intersection, Dogwood Lane Eastern Terminus of
right-of-way; and
South Chavis Street & Peach Street Intersection, Peach Street Eastern Terminus of right-of-way.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H291-v-1*